Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1205
Musical and amusement organizations; tax; inclusion in appropriation ordinance.

When a city or village has voted as required by section 18-1203 to establish and maintain a vocal, instrumental, or amusement organization, there shall thereafter be included in the annual estimate of expenses of such city or village a levy of not to exceed two and one-tenth cents or three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars, as the case may be, upon the taxable value of the taxable property of such city or village for each year for such purpose. The levy so made shall be included in the appropriation ordinance.

Laws 1915, c. 219, § 2, p. 488;

C.S.1922, § 4472;

Laws 1927, c. 40, § 2, p. 174;

C.S.1929, § 18-902;

R.S.1943, § 18-1205;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 32, p. 950;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 74;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 75;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 79.
August 28, 2021